District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.38

Availability of income and resources.

All income and other resources shall be identifiable as to nature, amount, and time of receipt, and must be actually available to the applicant or recipient for his or her current use. Unpredictable and inconsequential gifts or earnings shall not be considered resources.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 538, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-205.38.